Utah statutes.
34A-3-111.   Compensation not additional to that provided for accidents.
The compensation provided under this chapter is not in addition to
compensation that may be payable under Chapter 2, and in all cases when injury
results by reason of an accident arising out of and in the course of
employment and compensation is payable for the injury under Chapter 2,
compensation under this chapter may not be payable.
